Hawaii statutes.
§448H-5 Powers and duties of the board.
In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the board shall:

(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 to
carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(2) Develop, apply, review and upgrade appropriate
techniques, including examinations and investigations for determining whether a
person meets the requirements of this chapter and standards to insure that
elevator mechanics will be persons qualified to serve as such;

(3) Prescribe, at a minimum, that a nationally
recognized examination, augmented with locally developed material, be used in
testing for licensure, the passing grade for the examination to be not less
than seventy per cent;

(4) Issue licenses to persons determined, after
application of those techniques, to have met the required qualifications and
revoke or suspend licenses, previously issued by the board pursuant to hearings
held in accordance with chapter 91, in any case where the individual holding
any license is determined substantially to have failed to conform to the
required qualifications, this chapter, or the rules of the board;

(5) Establish and carry out procedures designed to
insure that persons licensed as elevator mechanics will, during any period they
serve as such, comply with the requirements of this chapter, the rules of the
board, and chapter 397 and rules adopted thereunder;

(6) Receive, investigate, and take appropriate action
with respect to, any charge or complaint filed with the board to the effect
that any individual licensed as an elevator mechanic has failed to comply with
the requirements of this chapter regarding any complaint regarding job
performance by mechanics, the rules of the board, or chapter 397 and the rules
adopted thereunder;

(7) Register apprentice elevator mechanics;

(8) Maintain a record of its proceedings;

(9) Assist and advise the department of labor and
industrial relations in the adoption of rules relating to the conditions of
work for elevator mechanics including requirements related to equipment or
facilities essential for the safe installation, repair, maintenance, or
alteration of any elevator, dumbwaiter, escalator, moving walk or ramp, and
lift; and

(10) Notify the department of labor and industrial
relations of any fact or situation that, in the opinion of the board,
constitutes a violation of chapter 397 or of any rule adopted thereunder. [L
1971, c 190, pt of §1; am L 1973, c 181, §1; am L 1979, c 217, §4; am L 1983, c
36, §4; am L 1985, c 198, §2; am L 1992, c 202, §88; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next